Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-762
Blanket sickness and accident insurance, defined.

Blanket sickness and accident insurance is hereby declared to be that form of sickness and accident insurance covering special groups of persons as enumerated in one of the following subsections (1) to (5):

(1) Under a policy or contract issued to any common carrier, which shall be deemed the policyholder, covering a group defined as all persons who may become passengers on such common carrier.

(2) Under a policy or contract issued to an employer, who shall be deemed the policyholder, covering any group of employees defined by reference to exceptional hazards incident to such employment.

(3) Under a policy or contract issued to a college, school, or other institution of learning or to the head or principal thereof, who or which shall be deemed the policyholder, covering students or teachers.

(4) Under a policy or contract issued in the name of any volunteer fire department, first-aid, or other such volunteer group, which shall be deemed the policyholder, covering all of the members of such department or group.

(5) Under a policy or contract issued to any other substantially similar group which, in the discretion of the Director of Insurance, may be subject to the issuance of a blanket sickness and accident policy or contract.

Laws 1947, c. 164, § 17(1), p. 470.